Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2253YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 492 Section 1. Section 331.757, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The county attorney may appoint, with the approval of 3 the board, an assistant county attorney to serve as a full-time 4 prosecutor. A full-time prosecutor shall refrain from the 5 private practice of law. The county attorney shall determine 6 the compensation paid to a full-time prosecutor within the 7 budget set for the county attorneyâs office by the board. 8 Except in counties having a population of more than two hundred 9 thousand, the The annual salary of an assistant county attorney 10 shall not exceed eighty-five percent of the maximum annual 11 salary of a full-time county attorney. 12 Sec. 2. Section 331.904, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. The annual base salary of the first and second deputy 15 officer of the office of auditor, treasurer, and recorder, the 16 deputy in charge of elections administration, the deputy in 17 charge of the motor vehicle registration and title division, 18 and the deputy in charge of driverâs license issuance shall 19 each be an amount not to exceed eighty-five percent of the 20 annual salary of the deputyâs principal officer . In , including 21 in offices where for which more than two deputies are required , 22 the annual base salary of each additional deputy shall be an 23 amount not to exceed eighty percent of the principal officerâs 24 salary . The amount of the annual base salary of each deputy 25 shall be certified by the principal officer to the board 26 and, if a deputyâs annual base salary does not exceed the 27 limitations specified in this subsection , the board shall 28 certify the annual base salary to the auditor. The board shall 29 not certify a deputyâs annual base salary which that exceeds 30 the limitations of this subsection . 31 Sec. 3. Section 331.904, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. The annual base salary of a first or second deputy 34 sheriff shall not exceed eighty-five percent of the annual base 35 -1- LSB 2253YH (3) 91 ll/js 1/ 2 H.F. 492 salary of the sheriff. 1 Sec. 4. Section 331.904, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 3. The annual salary of each assistant county attorney 4 shall be determined by the county attorney within the budget 5 set for the county attorneyâs office by the board. The salary 6 of an assistant county attorney shall not exceed eighty-five 7 percent of the maximum salary of a full-time county attorney. 8 The county attorney shall inform the board of the full-time 9 or part-time status of each assistant county attorney. In 10 the case of a part-time assistant county attorney, the county 11 attorney shall inform the board of the approximate number of 12 hours per week the assistant county attorney shall devote to 13 official duties. 14